New York, session 2025-2026, A4757.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known as the "Fire depart- 2 ment and Long Island rail road communication enhancement act". 3 § 2. The Long Island rail road commuter's council is directed to study 4 emerging technologies which would allow seamless communication between 5 fire departments and the Long Island rail road. Such study shall 6 include, but not be limited to: 7 (a) assessing technological solutions and communication protocols that 8 enable real-time communication between fire departments and the Long 9 Island rail road; 10 (b) examine potential methods for fire departments to notify train 11 conductors promptly in the event of an emergency requiring such dispatch 12 of a fire truck, ensuring a conductor receives notice to halt the train; 13 (c) examine the feasibility of implementing a system that enables 14 train conductors to receive alerts from fire departments allowing such 15 conductor to temporarily halt trains at the preceding station for a 16 specified period, facilitating unobstructed emergency response; 17 (d) considering the impact of such technological solutions on train 18 schedules, passenger safety, and emergency response efficiency; and 19 (e) engaging with relevant stakeholders, including, but not limited 20 to, fire department officials, transportation experts, and emergency 21 response professionals, to ensure a comprehensive evaluation. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07302-01-5 A. 4757 2 1 § 3. The Long Island rail road commuter's council shall make a report 2 to the Metropolitan transportation authority of its findings, conclu- 3 sions, and recommendations no later than twelve months after the effec- 4 tive date of this act. Such report shall include an outline of its find- 5 ings, recommendations, and proposed technological solutions for 6 implementing effective communication mechanisms between fire departments 7 and the Long Island rail road. Further, such report shall include a 8 cost-benefit analysis, potential challenges, and proposed timeline for 9 such implementation of the recommended solutions. 10 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 11 deemed repealed twelve months after it shall have become a law.